Utah statutes.
67-1-11.   Gender balance in appointing board members.
(1)  As used in this section, "appointing authority" means the speaker of the
House, the president of the Senate, the governor, the governor's designee,
nominating committee, or executive branch officer or other body empowered by
statute or rule to make any appointment or nomination for appointment to any
board, committee, bureau, commission, council, panel, or other entity.
(2)  In making a nomination, appointment, or reappointment to fill a vacancy
on any board, committee, bureau, commission, council, or other entity, the
appointing authority shall strongly consider nominating, appointing, or
reappointing a qualified individual whose gender is in the minority on that
entity.
